Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2406
Grants; criteria.

From amounts appropriated to the commission for the Commission Grant Program or funds available through the federal act, the commission shall award grants on a competitive basis to eligible applicants based upon criteria determined by the commission.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 447, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 26;

Laws 1997, LB 424, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 45;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 9.